Washington statutes.
RCW 31.40.900

Severability—1989 c 212.

If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid or, if in the written opinion of the small business administration, is contrary to the intent and purposes of the 7(a) loan guaranty program, the director shall not enforce such provision but the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected.

[ 1994 c 92 s 273; 1989 c 212 s 16.]